Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-1304
Sinking funds; investments authorized; limitation upon use.

All funds received by municipal treasurers, by donation or by tax levy, as hereinbefore provided, shall, as they accumulate, be immediately invested by said treasurer, with the written approval of the local governing body, in the manner provided in section 77-2341. Whenever investments of said sinking fund or funds are made, as aforesaid, the nature and character of the same shall be reported to the local governing body, and said investment report shall be made a matter of record by the municipal clerk in the proceedings of such local governing body. The sinking fund, or sinking funds, accumulated under the provisions of sections 19-1301 to 19-1304, shall constitute a special fund, or funds, for the purpose or purposes for which the same was authorized and shall not be used for any other purpose unless authorized by sixty percent of the qualified electors of said municipality voting at a general election favoring such change in the use of said sinking fund or sinking funds; Provided, that the question of the change in the use of said sinking fund or sinking funds, when it shall fail to carry, shall not be resubmitted in substance for a period of one year from and after the date of said election.

Laws 1939, c. 12, § 4, p. 82;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 19-1304;

R.S.1943, § 19-1304.